New York, session 2025-2026, A2098.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 8-600 of the election law, as 2 added by chapter 6 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 3 1. Beginning the tenth day prior to any general, primary, run-off 4 primary pursuant to subdivision one of section 6-162 of this chapter or 5 special election for any public or party position except for such an 6 election held pursuant to title two of article six or article fifteen of 7 this chapter, and ending on and including the second day prior to such 8 general, primary, run-off primary or special election for such public 9 office or party position, persons duly registered and eligible to vote 10 at such election shall be permitted to vote as provided in this title. 11 Where such early voting period includes a federal holiday, early voting 12 shall be prohibited on such federal holiday and the board of elections 13 shall add an additional day to the early voting period. The board of 14 elections shall establish procedures, subject to approval of the state 15 board of elections, to ensure that persons who vote during the early 16 voting period shall not be permitted to vote subsequently in the same 17 election. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date as the reversion of 19 subdivision 1 of section 8-600 of the election law as provided in 20 section 18 of chapter 474 of the laws of 2023, as amended. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00646-02-5